District of Columbia statutes.
16-301

Jurisdiction; rules.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia has jurisdiction to hear and determine petitions and decrees of adoption of any adult or child with authority to make such rules, not inconsistent with this chapter, as shall bring fully before the court for consideration the interests of the prospective adoptee, the natural parents, the petitioner, and any other properly interested party.

(b)

Jurisdiction shall be conferred when any of the following circumstances exist:

(1)

petitioner is a legal resident of the District of Columbia;

(2)

petitioner has actually resided in the District for at least one year next preceding the filing of the petition;

(3)

the child to be adopted is in the legal care, custody, or control of the Mayor or a child-placing agency licensed under the laws of the District; or

(4)

the child to be adopted was born in the District of Columbia.

(c)

The jurisdiction conferred upon the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by subsection (b)(4) of this section shall apply retroactively to all children born in the District of Columbia on or after July 18, 2009.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 555, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(a)(1)
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 4(a), 35 DCR 147
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-233, § 2, 59 DCR 14769
Exclusive adoption jurisdiction, see § 11-1101.
This section is referenced in § 16-4601.02.
1981 Ed., § 16-301.
1973 Ed., § 16-301.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-233 added (b)(4); added (c); and made related changes.